Tennessee, session 114, SB2429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-1-111(a)(1)(D)(iii), is amended by
deleting "April 1" and substituting "April 30".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2429
012727
- 1 -